Illinois, session 104th, HB4856.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the New 5Child Bonding Leave Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Child" means an employee's son or daughter who is a 8biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, a legal 9ward, or a child of a person standing in loco parentis. 10    "Department" means the Department of Labor. 11    "Employee" has the meaning set forth in Section 2 of the 12Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act and also includes any 13employee of the State of Illinois. 14    "Employer" has the meaning set forth in Section 2 of the 15Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act and also includes the 16State of Illinois. 17    "FMLA leave" means leave an employee is entitled to under 18the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993. 19    Section 10. New child bonding leave. 20    (a) An employee who has gained custody of a child within 21the previous 4 weeks, either through birth, adoption, foster 22care placement, or otherwise, is entitled to unpaid leave as   HB4856- 2 -LRB104 20506 SPS 33979 b1follows: 2        (1) an employee who is entitled to FMLA leave and has 3    exhausted all available FMLA leave is entitled to 12 weeks 4    of leave; 5        (2) an employee who is entitled to FMLA leave and has 6    not exhausted all available FMLA leave is entitled to 12 7    weeks of leave that shall run concurrently with any 8    remaining period of FMLA leave; and 9        (3) an employee who is not entitled to FMLA leave is 10    entitled to 12 weeks of leave. 11    (b) An employer shall not require that an employee use any 12paid leave available to the employee for any reason instead of 13leave the employee is entitled to under this Act. An employee 14who is entitled to take paid or unpaid leave, including 15family, medical, sick, annual, personal, or similar leave, 16from employment, under federal, State, or local law, a 17collective bargaining agreement, or an employment benefits 18program or plan, may elect to substitute any period of leave 19for an equivalent period of leave provided under this Act. 20    (c) Leave may be taken continually or intermittently at 21the employee's selection. An employer may require that leave 22be taken in minimum increments of not less than 2 hours in 23duration. 24    (d) Upon the conclusion of leave taken under this Act, an 25employee shall be reinstated to the employee's former position 26or a substantially equivalent one with no loss of benefits   HB4856- 3 -LRB104 20506 SPS 33979 b1held or accrued prior to taking leave. During the period of 2leave, any health insurance benefits shall be maintained by an 3employer as if an employee had not taken leave. An employer 4shall not require an employee who uses leave to provide a 5replacement worker. 6    (e) An employer may require an employee to submit 7documentation to demonstrate that the employee is entitled to 8leave under this Act. 9    Section 15. Unlawful employer practices. 10    (a) It is unlawful for any employer to take any adverse 11action against an employee because the employee: 12        (1) exercises rights or attempts to exercise rights 13    under this Act; 14        (2) opposes practices that the employee believes to be 15    in violation of this Act; or 16        (3) supports the exercise of rights of another under 17    this Act. 18    (b) Exercising rights under this Act includes, but is not 19limited to, filing an action or instituting or causing to be 20instituted any proceeding under or related to this Act, 21providing or agreeing to provide any information in connection 22with any inquiry or proceeding relating to any right provided 23under this Act, or testifying to or agreeing to testify in any 24inquiry or proceeding relating to any right provided under 25this Act.   HB4856- 4 -LRB104 20506 SPS 33979 b1    Section 20. Department responsibilities. 2    (a) The Department shall administer and enforce this Act 3and adopt rules under the Illinois Administrative Procedure 4Act for the purpose of this Act. The Department has the powers 5and the parties have the rights provided in the Illinois 6Administrative Procedure Act for contested cases. The 7Department shall have the power to conduct investigations in 8connection with the administration and enforcement of this 9Act, including the power to conduct depositions and discovery 10and to issue subpoenas. If the Department finds cause to 11believe that this Act has been violated, the Department shall 12notify the parties in writing and the matter shall be referred 13to an administrative law judge to schedule a formal hearing in 14accordance with hearing procedures established by rule. 15    (b) The Department is authorized to impose civil penalties 16prescribed in Section 25 in administrative proceedings that 17comply with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act and to 18supervise the payment of the unpaid wages and damages owing to 19the employee or employees under this Act. The Department may 20bring any legal action necessary to recover the amount of 21unpaid wages, damages, and penalties, and the employer shall 22be required to pay the costs. Any sums recovered by the 23Department on behalf of an employee under this Act shall be 24paid to the employee or employees affected.   HB4856- 5 -LRB104 20506 SPS 33979 b1    Section 25. Enforcement. 2    (a) An employee who believes the employee's rights under 3this Act or any rule adopted under this Act have been violated 4may, within 60 days after the date of the last event 5constituting the alleged violation for which the action is 6brought, file a complaint with the Department or file a civil 7action. 8    (b) An employer that violates any provision of this Act or 9any rule adopted under this Act is subject to a civil penalty 10for each employee affected not to exceed $5,000.11    (c) A civil action may be brought in the circuit court by 12an employee to enforce this Act. The circuit court may enjoin 13any act or practice that violates or may violate this Act and 14may order any other equitable relief that is necessary and 15appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce this Act.